New York, session 2025-2026, A790.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The cannabis law is amended by adding a new section 131-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 131-b. Illegal cannabis retailer directory. 1. The office shall 4 develop and maintain a directory of businesses that have been closed by 5 the office or local authorities as a result of a temporary closing order 6 or temporary restraining order. Such directory shall contain the follow- 7 ing information: 8 (a) The name and address of each such business; 9 (b) The name of the business owner; 10 (c) The name of the building owner; 11 (d) The date each business was permanently or temporarily closed; 12 (e) The date of the most recent action taken against each such busi- 13 ness, including, but not limited to, hearings, determinations made by 14 the court, and the issuance of penalties or violations; and 15 (f) A list of any penalties or violations issued to each such busi- 16 ness. 17 2. Such directory shall be updated on a weekly basis and the office 18 shall work with appropriate agencies and police departments to ensure 19 such directory contains accurate information. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02575-01-5